Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201760-6,311
Moped; operator; Nebraska Rules of the Road; applicable.

(1) Any person who rides a moped upon a roadway shall have all of the rights and shall be subject to all of the duties applicable to the driver of a motor vehicle under the Nebraska Rules of the Road except for special moped regulations in the rules and except for those provisions of the rules which by their nature can have no application.

(2) Regulations applicable to mopeds shall apply whenever a moped is operated upon any highway or upon any path set aside by the Department of Transportation or a local authority for the use of mopeds.

Laws 1979, LB 23, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,198;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 407;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 227.